Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
658D

INTERNATIONAL
ARBITRATION]

Section

658D-1 Short title

658D-2 Statement of findings and declaration of
purposes

658D-3 Policy

658D-4 Scope

658D-5 Definitions

658D-6 Consent to jurisdiction

658D-7 Certain legal authorities for
international

commercial disputes resolution

658D-8 Arbitral tribunal or panel; powers

658D-9 Enforcement

Law Journals and Reviews

Hawaii's Bid to be an International Alternative
Dispute Resolution Forum. 22 HBJ, no. 1, at 67 (1989).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next